nb: Målstørrelsesstandard: HabaWaba Youth Regulation; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/strand; World Aquatics (FINA)-standard; Annet
pt-PT: Padrão de tamanho da meta: Regulamentar juvenil HabaWaba; Júnior Sub-10; Júnior Sub-12; Mini; Splashball/Praia; Regulamentar World Aquatics (FINA); Outro
nl: Doel maatnorm: HabaWaba Youth Regulation; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/Beach; World Aquatics (FINA) Regulation; Anders
sl-SI: Standardna velikost gola: Uradna mladinska velikost HabaWaba; Mladinska (do 10 let); Mladinska (do 12 let); Mini; Splashball/za na plažo; Uradna velikost World Aquatics (FINA); Drugo
tr: Kale boyut standardı: HabaWaba Genç Nizami; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/Plaj; World Aquatics (FINA) Nizami; Diğer
th: มาตรฐานขนาดประตู: มาตรฐานเยาวชน HabaWaba; รุ่นจูเนียร์ 10U; รุ่นจูเนียร์ 12U; มินิ; สแปลชบอล/ชายหาด; มาตรฐาน World Aquatics (FINA); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Standardna veličina gola: HabaWaba službena veličina za mlade; Juniori do 10 godina (10U); Juniori do 12 godina (12U); Mini; Splashball / na pijesku; Pravila World Aquatics (FINA); Ostalo
sv: Standard för målstorlek: HabaWaba ungdom standard; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/strand; World Aquatics-standard (FINA); Annan
zh-CN: 球门尺寸标准: HabaWaba 青年规定; 青少年 10U; 青少年 12U; 迷你; 水上球/沙滩; 世界水上运动 (FINA) 规定; 其他
ko: 골대 크기 기준: HabaWaba 유스 정규; 주니어 10U; 주니어 12U; 미니; 스플래시볼/비치; World Aquatics(FINA) 정규; 기타
ru: Стандарт размера ворот: Детский стандарт HabaWaba; Юниоры до 10 лет (10U); Юниоры до 12 лет (12U); Мини; Сплэшбол/Пляжный; Стандарт World Aquatics (FINA); Другое
ro-RO: Standardul pentru dimensiunea porții: Regulament HabaWaba Tineret; Juniori 10U; Juniori 12U; Mini; Splashball/Plajă; Regulament World Aquatics (FINA); Altele
bg-BG: Стандарт за размер на вратата: Стандарт HabaWaba за младежи; За деца 10U; За деца 12U; Мини; Сплашбол/плаж; Стандарт на World Aquatics (FINA); Друго
pl: Standard rozmiaru bramki: Regulamin HabaWaba Youth; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball / plażowy; Regulamin World Aquatics (FINA); Inny
pt-BR: Padrão de tamanho do gol/traves: HabaWaba Juvenil Oficial; Júnior Sub-10; Júnior Sub-12; Mini; Splashball/Praia; Oficial World Aquatics (FINA); Outro
it: Standard relativi alle dimensioni della porta: Regolamento giovanile HabaWaba; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/Beach; Regolamento World Aquatics (FINA); Altro
cs: Standardní velikost branky: Předpisová mládežnická HabaWaba; Junioři 10U; Junioři 12U; Mini; Splashball/Plážová; Předpisová organizace World Aquatics (FINA); Ostatní
fr: Standard de taille du but: Réglementaire junior HabaWaba; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/plage; Réglementaire World Aquatics (FINA); Autre
el: Πρότυπο μεγέθους τέρματος: Επίσημο εφηβικό HabaWaba; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/Παραλίας; Επίσημο World Aquatics (FINA); Άλλο
hu: Kapuméret standard: HabaWaba ifjúsági szabványos; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/Strand; World Aquatics (FINA) szabványos; Egyéb
es: Estándar de tamaño del arco: Reglamentario juvenil HabaWaba; Júnior 10U; Júnior 12U; Mini; Splashball/Playa; Reglamento de World Aquatics (FINA); Otro
de: Standard der Torgröße: HabaWaba Youth Regulation; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/Beach; World Aquatics- (FINA) Standard; Andere
vi: Tiêu chuẩn kích thước khung thành: Tiêu chuẩn thiếu niên HabaWaba; Thanh thiếu niên 10U; Thanh thiếu niên 12U; Mini; Bóng nước/Bãi biển; Tiêu chuẩn Thể thao dưới nước Thế giới (FINA); Khác
lt-LT: Vartų dydžio standartas: „HabaWaba“ jaunuolių oficialaus dydžio; Jaunių 10U; Jaunių 12U; Mini; „Splashball“ / paplūdimio; Pasaulio vandens sporto („World Aquatics“ / FINA) oficialaus dydžio; Kita
da: Standard for målstørrelse: HabaWaba Junior-officiel; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/strand; World Aquatics-officiel (FINA); Anden
fi: Maalin kokostandardi: HabaWaba-nuorten virallinen; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/beach; World Aquatics (FINA) virallinen; Muu
sk-SK: Norma veľkosti bránky: HabaWaba Youth Regulation; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/Beach; Predpisy World Aquatics (FINA); Iné
zh-TW: 球門尺寸標準: HabaWaba 青少年標準; 10 歲以下兒童; 12 歲以下兒童; 迷你; 戲水/沙灘; 世界水上運動總會 (FINA) 標準; 其他
en: Goal size standard: HabaWaba Youth Regulation; Junior 10U; Junior 12U; Mini; Splashball/Beach; World Aquatics (FINA) Regulation; Other
ja: ゴールサイズ基準: HabaWabaユース規定; ジュニア10U; ジュニア12U; ミニ; スプラッシュボール/ビーチ; 世界水泳連盟 (FINA) 規定; その他